cs: Styl chrániče: NE – Hodnoty v uzavřeném seznamu jsou neúplné; nezahrnují možnosti jako „Junior S Pad“; “ nebo „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.“; „Swinging Dummy“; Jiné
fr: Type de coussin de frappe: NON – Les valeurs de Closed_list sont incomplètes ; elles n’incluent pas d’options comme « Junior S Pad »; » ou « Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad ».; » « Mannequin de frappe »; Autre
pl: Styl podkładki: NIE – wartości z zamkniętej listy są niekompletne; nie zawierają opcji takich jak „Junior S Pad”; ” lub „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad”.; ” „Swinging Dummy”; Inne
it: Stile del pad: NO - I valori Closed_list sono incompleti; non includono opzioni come “Junior S Pad; ” o “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Altro
sk-SK: Štýl chrániča: NIE – Hodnoty uzavretého zoznamu sú neúplné, nezahŕňajú možnosti ako „Junior S Pad“; “ alebo „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.“; “ „Swinging Dummy“; Iné
ko: 패드 방식: NO – Closed_list 값이 불완전합니다. “Junior S Pad”와 같은 옵션이 포함되어 있지 않습니다.; ” 또는 “Hit-Tech Leverage S 패드”; ” “스윙 더미”; 기타
sv: Typ av dyna: NEJ – Värdena i closed_list är ofullständiga, de inkluderar inte alternativ som ”Junior S Pad; ” eller ”Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad”.; ” ”Swinging Dummy; Övrigt
nb: Putestil: NEI – Closed_list-verdier er ufullstendige, de inkluderer ikke alternativer som «Junior S Pad»; » eller «Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.»; » «Swinging Dummy; Annet
hr-HR: Stil jastučića: NE – Vrijednosti closed_list su nepotpune; ne uključuju opcije poput „Junior S Pad”; ” ili „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” „Swinging Dummy”; Ostalo
el: Στυλ μαξιλαριού: ΌΧΙ - Οι τιμές της Closed_list είναι ελλιπείς, δεν περιλαμβάνουν επιλογές όπως «Junior S Pad; ” ή “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Άλλο
ro-RO: Stilul pad-ului: NU – Valorile Closed_list sunt incomplete; ele nu includ opțiuni precum „Junior S Pad; ” sau „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” „Swinging Dummy; Altele
lt-LT: Apsaugos tipas: NE – Uždarojo sąrašo vertės nėra išsamios; jos neapima tokių parinkčių kaip „Junior S Pad“; “ ar „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad“.; “ „Swinging Dummy; Kita
de: Typ des Polsters: NEIN – Closed_list-Werte sind unvollständig; sie enthalten keine Optionen wie „Junior S Pad; “ oder „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.“; “ „Swinging Dummy; Sonstige
pt-PT: Estilo de almofada: NÃO – Os valores da lista fechada estão incompletos; não incluem opções como “Junior S Pad; ” ou “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Outro
da: Pudestil: NEJ – Værdier for lukket liste er ufuldstændige; de inkluderer ikke muligheder som “Junior S Pad; ” eller “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad”.; ” “Swinging Dummy; Andet
ja: パッドスタイル: いいえ – 選択肢の値が不完全です (「Junior S Pad」などのオプションが含まれていません); ” または “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; その他
hu: Párnatípus: NEM – A zárt lista értékei hiányosak; nem tartalmaznak olyan opciókat, mint a „Junior S Pad; ” vagy „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” „Swinging Dummy; Egyéb
nl: Pad stijl: NEE - Closed_list-waarden zijn onvolledig; ze bevatten geen opties zoals “Junior S Pad; ” of “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Overig
sl-SI: Slog ščitnika: NE – Vrednosti z zaprtega seznama niso popolne; ne vključujejo možnosti, kot je »Junior S Pad; « ali »Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad«.; « »Swinging Dummy; Drugo
fi: Pehmustetyyppi: EI – Closed_list-arvot ovat epätäydellisiä; ne eivät sisällä vaihtoehtoja kuten "Junior S Pad"; " tai "Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad".; " "Swinging Dummy"; Muu
zh-CN: 打击垫款式: 否 - Closed_list 值不完整；不包含“Junior S 护垫”等选项; ”或“Hit-Tech Leverage S 护垫。”; ”“摇摆式假人; 其他
zh-TW: 墊子款式: 否 – Closed_list 值不完整；未包含如「Junior S Pad」等選項; 」或「Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad。」; 」「Swinging Dummy; 其他
tr: Ped tipi: HAYIR – Closed_list değerleri eksik; “Junior S Pad” gibi seçenekleri içermiyor; ” veya “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Diğer
pt-BR: Pad estilo: NÃO – Os valores da lista fechada estão incompletos; não incluem opções como “Junior S Pad; ” ou “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad”.; ” “Swinging Dummy; Outro
en: Pad style: NO – Closed_list values are incomplete; they do not include options like “Junior S Pad; ” or “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Other
es: Tipo de almohadilla: NO: los valores de Closed_list están incompletos; no incluyen opciones como “Junior S Pad; ” o “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad”.; ” “Swinging Dummy; Otro
th: สไตล์แผ่นรอง: ไม่ - ค่า Closed_list ไม่สมบูรณ์และไม่ครอบคลุมตัวเลือกต่างๆ เช่น “Junior S Pad; ” หรือ “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; อื่นๆ
ru: Стиль защиты: НЕТ — значения закрытого списка неполные; они не включают такие варианты, как «Junior S Pad»; » или «Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad».; » «Качающийся манекен; Другое
vi: Kiểu đệm: Không - Giá trị Closed_list không đầy đủ; chúng không bao gồm các tùy chọn như “Junior S Pad”; ” hoặc “Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.”; ” “Swinging Dummy; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на подложката: НЕ – Стойностите в затворения списък са непълни; не включват опции като „Junior S Pad; “ или „Hit-Tech Leverage S Pad.“; “ „Swinging Dummy“; Друго